California statutes. Streets and Highways Code
The authority may also provide for the making of a covenant requiring the fixing and prescribing by it and the collection by any lessee or operator of any or all facilities and properties, any revenues of which are charged with the payment of any bonds in connection with which such covenant is made, of all fees, tolls, rentals, or other charges in connection with the services and facilities furnished by such lessee or operator, sufficient to assure the payment by such lessee or operator to such authority of the rentals or other charges payable by such lessee or operator to such authority.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1388.)
-------------------------------------------

33117.

The authority may provide for the making of a covenant requiring the authority to provide for the establishment and maintenance of reserve funds, sinking funds, or other special funds in the city treasury or special trust accounts in a bank or trust company to insure payment, when due or payable, whether at maturity or upon redemption, of the principal of and interest on any bonds, including premiums, if any due, upon the redemption of any thereof, or to insure the application of the proceeds of such bonds to the purposes for which the same were issued, or for any other appropriate purpose. Any money placed in any such reserve, sinking, or other special fund or trust account shall constitute a trust fund and shall be applied only to the purposes for which it was created.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1388.)
-------------------------------------------

33118.

The authority may provide for the making of a covenant requiring it to apply the proceeds of the bonds in connection with which such covenant is made, or any part thereof, to the acquisition or construction of a specified facility, or other specified purpose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1388.)
-------------------------------------------

33119.

The authority may provide for the making of a covenant restricting the incurring of additional indebtedness payable in whole or in part out of revenues or funds which are charged with the payment of any bonds in connection with which such covenant is made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1388.)
-------------------------------------------

33120.

The authority may provide for the making of a covenant requiring it to carry insurance on any facilities or properties any revenues of which are charged with the payment of any bonds in connection with which such covenant is made, or any operations incident thereto, specifying or limiting the kind, amount and character of such insurance, and providing for the use and disposition of the proceeds of any such insurance thereafter collected.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1388.)
-------------------------------------------

33121.

The authority may provide for the terms and conditions upon which any bonds may become or be declared due and payable prior to maturity, upon the happening of any specified event of default, and the terms and conditions upon which such declaration and its consequences may be waived.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1388.)
-------------------------------------------

33122.

The authority may provide for the rights, limitations, powers, and duties arising upon breach by the authority of any of the covenants, conditions, or obligations contained in any resolution, contract, or agreement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1388.)
-------------------------------------------

33123.

The authority may provide for a procedure by which certain specified terms and conditions of any resolution, contract, or agreement may be subsequently amended or modified, or any provision thereof waived, with the consent of the authority and the vote or written assent of the holders of a specified principal amount of the bonds issued and outstanding. Such provision may authorize meetings of bondholders and specify the manner in which the consent of the bondholders may be given. Such provision shall specifically state the effect of such amendment, modification, or waiver upon the rights of the holders of all of the bonds and interest coupons appertaining to the bonds, whether attached to or detached from the bonds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1388.)
-------------------------------------------

33124.

The provisions for such procedure may include an agreement that bonds held by the authority, the city, or by any other person or entity who or which the authority may determine to be so interested in the matter as to make it proper, shall not be counted as outstanding bonds, and that the holders thereof shall not be entitled to vote or assent with respect to such amendment, modification or waiver, but shall nevertheless be subject thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1388.)
-------------------------------------------

33125.

The authority may provide for such other acts and matters as it may deem to be necessary, convenient, or desirable to secure the bonds or to make them more marketable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1388.)
-------------------------------------------

33126.

The authority may designate a bank or trust company as a trustee for the holders of bonds issued pursuant to this part, and may authorize the trustee to act on behalf of the bondholders, and to exercise and prosecute on their behalf the rights and remedies available to them.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

33127.

The authority may fix and determine the conditions upon which any trustee shall receive, hold, or disburse any or all funds coming into its hands pursuant to any resolution, contract, or agreement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1388.)
-------------------------------------------

33128.

The authority may prescribe the duties and powers of any trustee respecting the payment of principal and interest on bonds, the redemption of bonds, the registration and discharge from registration of bonds, and the management of any sinking or other fund provided as security for bonds, and with respect to any other appropriate matter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1388.)
-------------------------------------------

33129.

The authority may provide for the issuance of bonds in series, and for the division of any issue into two or more divisions, and may fix different maturities or dates of such bonds, different rates of interest, or prescribe different terms and conditions for the bonds of the several series or divisions. After having authorized or issued bonds the authority may from time to time thereafter authorize and issue other bonds, subject to any covenants it may have made restricting the future issuance of bonds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1388.)
-------------------------------------------

33130.

All bonds of the same authorized issue need not be of the same kind or character, have the same security, or bear the same interest rate, but the terms of the bonds shall in each case be prescribed by the authority.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1388.)
-------------------------------------------

33133.

Bonds may be callable upon such terms, conditions, and notice as the authority determines, and upon the payment of the premium, if any, fixed by the authority in the proceedings for their issuance. No bond shall be subject to call or redemption prior to its fixed maturity date unless the right to exercise such call is expressly stated on its face.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1388.)
-------------------------------------------

33134.

The authority may provide for the payment of the principal and interest of bonds at any place within the State, or for the payment or collection of such principal without the State, and in any specified coin or currency of the United States.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1388.)
-------------------------------------------

33135.

Signatures on the bonds and interest coupons may be printed, lithographed, or engraved facsimile, except that on the bonds, but not on the interest coupons, the countersignature of the clerk or other officer of the authority designated by it which shall be manually affixed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1388.)
-------------------------------------------

33136.

If any officer or representative whose signature or countersignature appears upon the bonds or coupons ceases to be an officer or representative before the delivery of the bonds or coupons, his signature or countersignature is nevertheless valid and of the same force and effect as if he had continued to hold his office or position until the delivery of the bonds and coupons.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1388.)
-------------------------------------------

33137.

Bonds issued under this part may be serial or sinking fund bonds. A bond by its terms shall not mature more than forty (40) years from its own date. If any authorized issue is divided into two or more series or divisions, the maximum maturity date shall be calculated from the date on the face of each bond separately, irrespective of the fact that different dates may be prescribed for the bonds of each separate series or division of any authorized issue.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1388.)
-------------------------------------------

33138.

The authority may sell bonds at a price below the par or face value, provided that the discount on any bonds so sold shall not exceed 8 percent of the par value thereof.

The interest rate on the bonds shall not exceed 8 percent, payable semiannually. The sale shall be conducted in compliance with Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 5800) of Division 6 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 130.)
-------------------------------------------

33139.

In determining the amount of bonds to be issued, the authority may include an amount for the purpose of establishing a reserve fund or funds for the security of the bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 678.)
-------------------------------------------

33140.

The authority may provide that interest on bonds issued for the acquisition, construction, or completion of any project may be paid out of the proceeds of the sale of the bonds during the actual construction of the project and for a period of not to exceed two years after completion of actual construction, or for any other reasonably limited period.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1388.)
-------------------------------------------

33141.

In the proceedings for the issuance of bonds, the authority may provide that the principal of and interest on the bonds constitute such charge upon the revenues of any project acquired, constructed or completed from the proceeds of the bonds, or upon other available and specified revenues or funds as may be provided for in such proceedings.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1388.)
-------------------------------------------

33142.

Pending the actual issuance or delivery of bonds, the authority may issue temporary or interim bonds, certificates, or receipts of any denominations, with or without coupons, to be exchanged for definitive bonds when ready for delivery.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

33143.

The principal, interest, and income of all bonds issued under this part are exempt from all taxation in this State, other than gift, inheritance, and estate taxes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1388.)
-------------------------------------------

33145.

The authority may provide for the issuance, sale, or exchange of refunding bonds to redeem or retire any revenue bonds issued by it. All provisions of this part applicable to the issuance of bonds are applicable to refunding bonds and to their issuance, sale or exchange. However, even if the alternative method provided for in Section 32655 of submitting to the electors the question of issuing bonds in a specific amount has been followed, without the submission of the question of adopting the revenue bond method of financing, no submission to the electors of the proposition of issuing refunding bonds shall be required as a prerequisite to the issuance of such refunding bonds; and if the proposition of adopting the revenue bond method of financing has been submitted and carried, it shall be full authority for the issuance of refunding bonds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1388.)
-------------------------------------------

33146.

Refunding bonds may be issued in a principal amount sufficient to provide funds for the payment of the bonds to be refunded and all expenses incident to the calling, retiring, or paying of the outstanding bonds and the issuance of the refunding bonds. These expenses include:

(a) The difference in amount between the par value of the refunding bonds and any amount less than par for which the refunding bonds are sold.

(b) The amount of interest upon the refunding bonds from the date of their sale to the date of payment of the bonds to be refunded or to the date upon which the bonds to be refunded will be paid pursuant to their call or pursuant to any agreement with the holders of such bonds.

(c) Any premium required to be paid to call or retire the outstanding bonds. 

(d) The interest accruing on the outstanding bonds to the date of their call or retirement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1388.)
-------------------------------------------

33147.

Bonds issued pursuant to this part are negotiable instruments.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1388.)
-------------------------------------------

33148.

An action to determine the validity of bonds may be brought pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 860) of Title 10 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1534.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Rates, Fees, and Charges [33250. - 33250.]

33250.

The authority shall have power, and it shall be its duty, fully and faithfully to keep and perform any covenant it may make pursuant to Section 33116 with or for the benefit of the holders of any bonds with respect to the fixing and maintaining of fees, tolls, rentals or other charges, and each and every other covenant it may make, or obligation it may assume, pursuant to any provision of this part, and it shall be the duty of each and every officer, representative and employee of the authority to do and perform each and every act necessary or appropriate for such keeping and performance by such authority of every such covenant and obligation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1388.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Rights of Obligees [33400. - 33400.]

33400.

In addition to all other rights conferred on an obligee and subject only to any contractual restrictions binding upon him, an obligee may:

(a) By mandamus, suit, action, or proceeding at law or in equity, compel the authority and its members, officers, agents or employees to perform every term, provision, and covenant contained in any contract of the authority with or for the benefit of the obligee, to carry out all covenants and agreements of the authority, and to fulfill all duties imposed upon the authority by this part.

(b) By suit, action, or proceeding in equity, enjoin any acts or things which are unlawful and in violation of any of the rights of the obligee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1388.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Miscellaneous Provisions [33550. - 33552.]

33550.

All claims for money or damages against the authority are governed by Part 3 (commencing with Section 900) and Part 4 (commencing with Section 940) of Division 3.6 of Title 1 of the Government Code except as provided therein, or by other statutes or regulations expressly applicable thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1715.)
-------------------------------------------

33552.

Any city may exercise any or all of the powers granted to an authority by this part alone, or in combination with powers granted by any other general law relative to parking facilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 4. PARKING DISTRICT LAW OF 1951 [35100. - 35708.]



  CHAPTER 1. General [35100. - 35113.]

35100.

This part may be cited as the Parking District Law of 1951.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 192.)
-------------------------------------------

35101.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions contained in this chapter shall govern the construction of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 192.)
-------------------------------------------

35102.

“Legislative body” means the legislative body of the city in which the district is located.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 192.)
-------------------------------------------

35103.

“Assessment roll” means the assessment roll used by the city for purposes of city taxation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 192.)
-------------------------------------------

35104.

“Net revenues,” as used with reference to a parking meter, means the revenues remaining after deductions for the cost of acquiring the meter and the cost of its maintenance, operation, repair, and servicing, and the cost of collecting the revenues therefrom, without allowance for depreciation or obsolescence.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1283.)
-------------------------------------------

35105.

“Real property” means land and improvements thereon.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 192.)
-------------------------------------------

35106.

“Parking places” includes parking lots, garages subsurface structures, and buildings for the parking of motor vehicles.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 192.)
-------------------------------------------

35107.

Any portion of a city may be formed into a parking district for the purposes set forth under this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 192.)
-------------------------------------------

35108.

In addition to matters specified elsewhere in this part, the acts authorized under this part include the following:

(a) The formation of districts.

(b) The acquisition of land, property, and rights of way necessary or convenient for use as public parking places for the parking of motor vehicles and for the opening, widening, straightening, or extending of streets, alleys, lanes, or walks necessary or convenient for ingress to or egress from any parking place.

(c) The improvement of any acquired land by the construction thereon of garages or other buildings or improvements of any kind or nature necessary or convenient for parking purposes.

(d) The improvement by grading, paving, draining, lighting, or otherwise of any parking place and any streets, alleys, lanes, or walks necessary or convenient for ingress to and egress from parking places.

(e) The issuance, sale, and payment of bonds for any or all of the foregoing purposes, and the levy and collection of ad valorem assessments upon real property within the district for the payment of all or a portion of the principal and interest of the bonds.

(f) The administration, maintenance, and operation of parking places acquired under this part.

(g) The fixing and collection of rentals, fees, and charges for the use of parking places and the use of moneys derived from the rentals, fees, and charges.

(h) The contribution by cities of money for the acquisition and improvement of the public parking places and public ways for ingress to and egress therefrom; the allocation and pledge of any revenues of the city derived from parking meters on public ways within the district to any of the purposes specified in this part, and the making of covenants and agreements with the bondholders to install and maintain such meters.

(i) The employment of engineers, attorneys, and other persons necessary or convenient for the doing of any act authorized by this part.

(j) The acquisition of property by gift, purchase, or eminent domain. Any conveyance of property or right of way as a gift may be conditional upon the use of the property for the purpose for which it is conveyed, or property may be conveyed to the city in trust for a particular use or uses and the conveyance may provide that upon the cessation or abandonment of such use or uses the property shall be reconveyed to the donor or to his or its successors or assigns. Any property acquired by condemnation or otherwise may be acquired in fee simple.

(k) The doing of all acts and things necessary or convenient for the accomplishment of the purposes of this part. The enumeration of specific authority in this part does not limit in any way the general authority granted by this subdivision.

(l) Any bonds issued pursuant to this part, and the interest on them, may be payable from gross or net revenues from the operation of the parking place or places acquired or improved with the bond proceeds, and may also be payable from all or part of the net revenues from parking meters on some or all of the public ways in the district. To the extent permitted by the provisions of this part, the bonds may also be payable from ad valorem assessments levied upon real property in the district within the limits provided in this part. Neither the city nor any of its officers shall be held otherwise liable for the payment of the principal and interest.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1283.)
-------------------------------------------

35108.5.

To expedite the making of any such acquisition and improvement, the legislative body may, at any time, transfer into the acquisition and construction fund, out of available funds, such sums as may be deemed necessary, and make such acquisitions or improvements or both, and pay such incidental expenses therefrom as deemed advisable, and such sums so transferred shall be deemed a loan to such special fund, and shall be repaid either from the proceeds of the bonds issued pursuant to this part, or from the gross or net revenues from the operation of the parking place or places, or from the net revenues from parking meters on some or all of the public ways in the district, or from ad valorem assessments levied upon real property in the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1030.)
-------------------------------------------

35109.

Any proceedings taken or bonds issued pursuant to this part shall not be held invalid for failure to comply with the provisions of this part, if the acts done and proceedings taken are not invalid under the State or Federal Constitutions. Any procedure not expressly set forth in this part but deemed necessary or convenient to carry out any purposes of this part is hereby authorized. This part shall be liberally construed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 192.)
-------------------------------------------

35110.

This part does not affect any other law relating to the same or a similar subject, but provides an alternative procedure for the subject to which it relates. When proceeding under this part, its provisions only shall apply.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 192.)
-------------------------------------------

35111.

Any territory included within a parking district formed pursuant to this part shall not be included within any other parking district or any vehicle parking district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 192.)
-------------------------------------------

35112.

The Special Assessment Investigation, Limitation and Majority Protest Act of 1931 shall not apply to proceedings under this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 192.)
-------------------------------------------

35113.

The curative clauses of this part are cumulative and each is to be given full effect.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1283.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Formation of District [35250. - 35276.]

35250.

The formation of a parking district may be proposed by petition signed by the owners of real property in the proposed district, as shown by the last equalized assessment roll, owning real property of an assessed value of not less than fifty-one percent (51%) of the total assessed value of all taxable real property in the district, as shown by the assessment roll, and owning taxable land in the proposed district constituting not less than fifty-one percent (51%) of the total area of all taxable land in the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1283.)
-------------------------------------------

35251.

The petition shall contain:

(a) A general description of the boundaries of the proposed district.

(b) A general description of the parking places proposed to be acquired.

(c) A general description of any public ways proposed to be acquired for ingress to or egress from the parking places.

(d) A general statement of the improvements to be made or constructed on the proposed parking places, the public ways proposed to be acquired, or existing public ways which would provide ingress to or egress from the proposed parking places.

(e) Any limits as to time and rate upon ad valorem assessments which may be levied upon taxable real property in the district for the purposes permitted by this part. The limits as to time shall not exceed 36 years from the date of the bonds, and the limits as to rate shall not exceed seventy-five cents ($0.75) on each one hundred dollars ($100) of assessed valuation.

This limit as to rate does not apply to any district in a chartered city. The petition shall contain the maximum tax rate which will be levied in any parking district in a chartered city.

(f) Any amount of money which it is proposed that the city contribute toward the cost and expense of the acquisitions and improvements proposed by the petition, toward the payment of incidental expenses of the proceedings hereunder, for the establishment of a reserve fund for the payment of the bonds and the interest thereon, or for other purposes in connection with the district.

(g) A general statement of the public ways within the district on which it is proposed the city install and maintain, or continue to maintain, parking meters, the net revenues from which will be allocated and pledged to any of the purposes specified in this part, and the period of time, measured from the date of the bonds, for which it is proposed that the city agree to maintain the meters. If it is proposed that only a specified amount, percentage, or portion of the net revenues shall be so allocated and pledged, the amount, percentage or portion shall be generally defined.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1958, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 54.)
-------------------------------------------

35252.

The petition shall be filed in the office of the clerk of the legislative body.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 780.)
-------------------------------------------

35253.

When the petition is filed, the clerk of the legislative body shall examine the petition. If it is signed by the requisite number of qualified signers, the clerk shall so certify to the legislative body.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 192.)
-------------------------------------------

35253.1.

If the petition is not signed by the requisite number of qualified signers, the clerk shall certify to the legislative body that said petition is insufficient. If the petition is insufficient, supplemental petitions may be filed within three months from the date of the certificate of insufficiency, or such additional period as the legislative body may allow, not to exceed six months from the date of the first certificate of insufficiency.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 780.)
-------------------------------------------

35253.2.

The clerk shall certify the sufficiency of the petition and any supplemental petitions to the legislative body, if the petition, together with supplemental petitions if any, shall be signed by the requisite number of signers as shown by the last equalized assessment roll upon the date of said certificate. Such certification shall be conclusive as to the sufficiency of the petition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 780.)
-------------------------------------------

35253.3.

If any person shown on the last equalized assessment roll to be the owner of land within the proposed district shall be unable to sign by reason of legal disability or shall cease to be the owner of all or any part of such land before the petition or supplemental petition shall have been filed with the clerk, said petition or supplemental petition may be signed by the legal representative (as hereinafter designated) or other successor in interest of said owner. All petitions signed by a person other than said owner shall be accompanied by written evidence, satisfactory to the clerk, that the signer

(a) In the case of a legal representative, is the duly appointed guardian, executor or administrator of the estate of said owner, or

(b) In the case of other successors in interest, is the holder of legal title to, or has the beneficial ownership in, said land.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 780.)
-------------------------------------------

35253.4.

If the assessed value of any parcel of land, and any improvements thereon, is not shown or separately shown upon the assessment roll, upon request of the clerk, the assessor shall estimate the assessed value of such parcel and any improvements thereon, and such estimate for the purpose of certifying said petition shall be considered the assessed value of such parcel, and any improvements thereon.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 780.)
-------------------------------------------

35254.

If the petition proposes a contribution of money by the city, the legislative body either shall reject the petition, or prior to the adoption of the resolution of intention, shall agree to make a contribution not less than the amount specified in the petition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 192.)
-------------------------------------------

35255.

The statement of the amount of city contribution in the petition or in the resolution of intention shall not prevent the city from making additional contributions to the project before or after the issuance of bonds therefor and shall not prevent the city from paying all or any part of the incidental expenses in connection with the proceedings under this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 192.)
-------------------------------------------

35256.

If the petition proposes that the city install and maintain, or continue to maintain, parking meters on public ways within the district, the legislative body either shall reject the petition, or prior to the adoption of the resolution of intention, shall agree to install and maintain, or continue to maintain, parking meters as proposed in the petition. The legislative body shall not so agree unless it finds and determines that the public interest, convenience, and necessity require that the meters be installed and maintained, or be continued to be maintained, as proposed in the petition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 192.)
-------------------------------------------

35257.

The legislative body shall either approve the petition or reject it. If it approves the petition, it shall direct the city engineer or other competent person to make and file with it a report showing the following:

(a) An estimate of the cost of the acquisitions and improvements proposed by the petition and of the incidental expenses in connection therewith and of the proceedings therefor.

(b) An estimate of the annual revenues which can be expected to be derived from the operation of the proposed parking places, and of the annual expenses of operating and maintaining the parking places exclusive of principal and interest on the bonds to be issued.

(c) An estimate of the annual net revenues which can be expected to be derived from the parking meters, the revenues from which are by the petition proposed to be pledged to any of the purposes specified in this part.

(d) The total assessed value of the real property within the proposed district as shown on the last equalized assessment roll.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1283.)
-------------------------------------------

35258.

Upon the filing of the report, the legislative body may adopt a resolution declaring its intention to form a parking district. The resolution shall contain substantially the following:

(a) The name of the proposed district.

(b) A description of its boundaries. This description may be general only and may refer to a map on file in the office of the clerk of the legislative body, which map shall show the boundaries of the proposed district and shall govern for all its details.

(c) A general description of the acquisitions and improvements proposed by the petition. This description may be in general terms and may refer to a map, plan, or sketch on file in the office of the clerk for a further description of what is proposed to be done.

(d) The estimates of costs, expenses, and revenues, and the assessed value of real property in the proposed district, as set forth in the report.

(e) The amount to be contributed by the city as proposed by the petition and agreed to by the legislative body.

(f) An estimate of the amount of the bonds proposed to be issued, the maximum number of years the bonds are to run, and the maximum rate of interest to be payable thereon not in excess of 7 percent a year.

(g) The limits, as stated in the petition, as to time and rate upon any ad valorem assessments which may be levied upon taxable real property in the district for the purposes permitted by this part.

(h) A general statement of the public ways within the district on which the city, as proposed by the petition, will install and maintain, or continue to maintain parking meters, the net revenues from which will be allocated and pledged to any of the purposes specified in this part, and the period of time, measured from the date of the bonds, for which the city will agree to maintain the meters. If it is proposed that only a portion of the net revenues be so allocated and pledged, that portion shall be generally defined.

(i) The time and place for two hearings on the proposed formation of the district and the time within which and the place where protests may be filed.

(j) The resolution shall make reference to the report on file in the office of the clerk.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1234, Sec. 38.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

35260.

Pursuant to Section 54954.6 of the Government Code, the clerk of the legislative body shall mail a copy of the resolution, postage prepaid, to each person to whom real property in the district is assessed as shown on the last equalized assessment roll, at his address as shown upon the roll, and to each person, whether owner in fee or having a lien upon, or legal or equitable interest in, any real property within the district, whose name and address and a designation of the real property in which he or she is interested is on file in the office of the clerk.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1234, Sec. 40.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

35261.

Any error, failure, or mistake in the mailing of the copy of resolution or any thereof and any failure of any person to receive the copy shall not affect in any way the validity of any proceedings hereunder.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 192.)
-------------------------------------------

35262.

Any person interested and objecting to the formation of the parking district, the extent thereof, the inclusion of his property therein, the proposed acquisitions and improvements, the issuance of bonds, or to any other proposal in the resolution of intention, may file a written protest with the clerk of the legislative body at any time prior to the time fixed for the hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 192.)
-------------------------------------------

35263.

At the hearing the legislative body shall hear and determine all protests filed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 192.)
-------------------------------------------

35264.

The legislative body’s decision on the protests shall be final and conclusive. However, if the owners of taxable real property in the district having an assessed valuation of more than one-half of the assessed valuation of all taxable real property in the district at the conclusion of the hearing have on file and not withdrawn their written protests objecting to the formation of the district, the legislative body shall find that a majority protest has been filed, and the proceeding shall be terminated. No further proceedings shall be had or taken pursuant to the petition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 192.)
-------------------------------------------

35265.

Any protest filed may be abandoned and withdrawn by written notice of such abandonment or withdrawal signed by the person who signed the protest and filed with the clerk of the legislative body at any time prior to the conclusion of the hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 192.)
-------------------------------------------

35266.

If a proceeding is terminated by the filing of a majority protest a new petition for the same purpose may not be filed until the expiration of one year from the date of the finding that a majority protest was filed. However, a new petition for a modified project may be filed at any time.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 192.)
-------------------------------------------

35267.

The hearing may be continued from time to time at the discretion of the legislative body.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 192.)
-------------------------------------------

35268.

At the hearing the legislative body may alter the boundaries of the proposed district as it finds to be proper and advisable and shall define and establish the boundaries, but the legislative body shall not modify the boundaries so as to include any territory which will not in its judgment be benefited by the proposed project, and no territory shall be excluded from the proposed district which will in the judgment of the legislative body be benefited by the proposed project.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1953, Ch. 256.)
-------------------------------------------

35269.

At the hearing the legislative body may increase, decrease, change, or otherwise modify the acquisitions or improvements to be made, but the legislative body shall not do so, without first procuring from the city engineer or other competent person a supplemental report showing the effect thereof upon the estimates and other data given in the original report.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 192.)
-------------------------------------------

35269.5.

If the legislative body proposes to make changes in the boundaries of the proposed district or in the acquisitions and improvements, it shall take the proceedings required by Sections 35270 to 35273, inclusive, and shall continue the hearing to the time fixed for hearing objections to the proposed changes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 256.)
-------------------------------------------

35270.
